Illinois, session 104th, SB2772.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Illinois Psilocybin Advisory Board Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) Providing access to mental health services for 8    veterans is vital.9        (2) Emerging research supports the use of 10    psychedelics, such as psilocybin, combined with 11    psychotherapy to treat mental health conditions, including 12    treatment-resistant depression, anxiety, post-traumatic 13    stress disorder (PTSD), substance use disorder, and 14    end-of-life psychological distress.15        (3) The United States Food and Drug Administration 16    has:17            (A) determined that preliminary clinical evidence 18        indicates that psilocybin may demonstrate substantial 19        improvement over available therapies for 20        treatment-resistant depression; and21            (B) granted a "Breakthrough Therapy" designation 22        for a treatment that uses psilocybin as a therapy for 23        treatment-resistant depression.  SB2772 Engrossed- 2 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1        (4) Through the Illinois Breakthrough Therapies for 2    Veteran Suicide Prevention Program, Illinois has become a 3    leader in providing access to breakthrough treatments for 4    veterans, including psilocybin and MDMA-assisted therapy.5        (5) Research conducted by domestic and international 6    medical institutions indicates that, when used with the 7    appropriate treatment protocols, psilocybin can be 8    efficacious and safe for the treatment of a variety of 9    mental health conditions, including, but not limited to, 10    addiction, depression, anxiety disorders, headache 11    disorders, and end-of-life psychological distress.12        (6) In order to transition away from criminalization 13    models while protecting people who use or may use drugs 14    and reducing any negative environmental or cultural 15    impacts, it is necessary to review the full legal context 16    in which relevant changes to the law are made. It is also 17    necessary to incorporate evidence-based policy, consult 18    with experts, and maintain open discourse based in harm 19    reduction, reciprocity, and human rights during the 20    process of developing alternative regulatory systems. 21    Section 10. Definitions. In this Act:22    "Administration session" means a structured session held 23under the direct supervision of a licensed facilitator where a 24client consumes and experiences the effects of a psilocybin 25product.  SB2772 Engrossed- 3 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1    "Board" means the Illinois Psilocybin Advisory Board 2established under this Act.3    "Client" means an individual who has received a referral 4for psilocybin service and who consumes a psilocybin product 5in an administration session in this State.6    "Entheogen" or "entheogenic substance" means the following 7substances in any form, regardless of whether the substance is 8regulated under the federal Controlled Substances Act or the 9Illinois Controlled Substances Act:10        (1) psilocybin;11        (2) psilocin;12        (3) dimethyltryptamine;13        (4) ibogaine, except ibogaine from iboga;14        (5) mescaline, except mescaline from peyote;15        (6) methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA);16        (7) lysergic acid diethylamide; and17        (8) ayahuasca.18    "Facilitator" means an individual who facilitates the 19provision of a psilocybin service in this State.20    "Integration session" means a meeting between a client and 21a facilitator that occurs after the client completes an 22administration session.23    "Post-administration evaluation session" means a meeting 24between a client and a facilitator that occurs immediately 25following the conclusion of an administration session and 26prior to the client's release from the service center.  SB2772 Engrossed- 4 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1    "Preparation session" means a meeting between a client and 2a facilitator that occurs before the client participates in an 3administration session.4    "Psilocybin" means psilocybin or psilocin.5    "Psilocybin product" means:6        (1) psilocybin-producing fungi;7        (2) mixtures or substances containing a detectable 8    amount of psilocybin naturally produced from 9    psilocybin-producing fungi; or10        (3) synthetically produced psilocybin or psilocin.11    "Psilocybin service" means a service provided to a client 12before, during, or after the client's consumption of a 13psilocybin product, including any of the following:14        (1) a preparation session;15        (2) an administration session;16        (3) an integration session; or17        (4) a post-administration evaluation session. 18    Section 15. Illinois Psilocybin Advisory Board.19    (a) The Illinois Psilocybin Advisory Board is established 20within the Department of Financial and Professional Regulation 21for the purpose of fulfilling the duties listed in Section 20 22of this Act. The Board shall consist of the following voting 23members:24        (1) a member of the Senate, appointed by the President 25    of the Senate;  SB2772 Engrossed- 5 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1        (2) a member of the Senate, appointed by the Minority 2    Leader of the Senate;3        (3) a member of the House of Representatives, 4    appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;5        (4) a member of the House of Representatives, 6    appointed by the Minority Leader of the House of 7    Representatives;8        (5) the Secretary of Financial and Professional 9    Regulation or the Secretary's designee;10        (6) the Director of Agriculture or the Director's 11    designee; and12        (7) a member of an Indigenous tribe or community or a 13    member of an organization representing an Indigenous tribe 14    or community with experience in the use of psychedelic 15    compounds, appointed by the Governor.16    (b) The Board shall include one voting member from each 17paragraph under this subsection (b). Individuals listed who 18are not selected as the voting member may be appointed to serve 19on the Board in a nonvoting advisory capacity:20        (1) the executive director of a statewide association 21    representing county sheriffs or his or her designee, the 22    executive director of a statewide association representing 23    chiefs of police or his or her designee, a representative 24    of the Chicago Police Department, appointed by the 25    Governor, the Director of the Illinois State Police, or 26    the Director's designee;  SB2772 Engrossed- 6 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1        (2) a veteran who has participated in clinical trials 2    related to psychedelic compounds, appointed by the 3    Governor, the Director of Veterans Affairs, or the 4    Director's designee;5        (3) a physician licensed to practice medicine in all 6    its branches in this State, an emergency physician 7    licensed to practice in this State, a representative of a 8    poison control center, or a physician certified in medical 9    toxicology, appointed by the Governor;10        (4) a doctor of osteopathic medicine licensed to 11    practice in this State or an individual who practices 12    naturopathy in this State, appointed by the Governor;13        (5) a psychologist licensed to practice in this State 14    who has experience engaging in the diagnosis or treatment 15    of mental, emotional, and behavioral conditions, a 16    psychiatrist licensed to practice in this State who has 17    experience engaging in the diagnosis or treatment of 18    mental, emotional, and behavioral conditions, a 19    professional counselor or a clinical professional 20    counselor licensed to practice in this State who has 21    experience engaging in the diagnosis or treatment of 22    mental, emotional, and behavioral conditions, a child and 23    adolescent psychiatrist licensed to practice in this 24    State, or a geriatric psychiatrist licensed to practice in 25    this State, appointed by the Governor;26        (6) a professional with experience conducting   SB2772 Engrossed- 7 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1    scientific research regarding the use of psychedelic 2    compounds in clinical therapy, an individual with 3    experience in the field of mycology, an individual with 4    experience in the field of ethnobotany, or an individual 5    with experience in the field of psychopharmacology, 6    appointed by the Governor;7        (7) a licensed social worker licensed in this State or 8    a licensed clinical social worker licensed in this State, 9    an individual with experience in the field of psilocybin 10    harm reduction, a certified alcohol and drug counselor 11    with advanced training who is certified to practice in 12    this State who has experience engaging in the diagnosis 13    and treatment of substance use disorders and co-occurring 14    conditions, an addiction medicine physician licensed to 15    practice in this State, or an addiction psychiatrist 16    licensed to practice in this State, appointed by the 17    Governor; and18        (8) a public health surveillance expert, or an expert 19    in the field of public health, community sciences, or a 20    related health field or an individual who is a member of or 21    represents a group that provides public health services 22    directly to members of the public, appointed by the 23    Governor.24    (c) The Board shall consist of the following nonvoting 25members in advisory capacity:26        (1) the Director of Revenue or the Director's   SB2772 Engrossed- 8 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1    designee;2        (2) the Director of Insurance or the Director's 3    designee;4        (3) the Secretary of Human Services or the Secretary's 5    designee;6        (4) the Illinois Chief Behavioral Health Officer; and7        (5) the Director of Public Health or the Director's 8    designee, which may include a local health official.9    (d) Within 3 months after the effective date of this Act, 10the applicable appointing authority shall appoint the 11individuals specified in subsections (b) and (c) to the Board.12    (e) Board members shall serve at the pleasure of the 13applicable appointing authority. Members may be eligible for 14reappointment. If there is a vacancy for any reason, the 15applicable appointing authority shall appoint an individual to 16fill the vacancy in a timely manner.17    (f) A majority of the voting members of the Board 18constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business.19    (g) Official action by the Board requires the approval of 20a majority of the voting members of the Board.21    (h) The Board shall elect one of its voting members to 22serve as chairperson.23    (i) By November 1, 2026, the Board shall hold its first 24meeting at a time and place specified by the Governor. After 25the first meeting of the Board, the Board shall meet at least 26once monthly at a time and place determined by the chairperson   SB2772 Engrossed- 9 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1or a majority of the voting members of the Board. The Board may 2also meet at other times and places specified by the call of 3the chairperson or a majority of the voting members of the 4Board.5    (j) The Board may adopt policies and procedures necessary 6for the operation of the Board.7    (k) The Board may establish committees or subcommittees 8necessary for the operation of the Board.9    (l) Board members shall serve without compensation.10    (m) The Board, in compliance with the Open Meetings Act, 11may meet virtually. 12    Section 20. Duties of the Board. 13    (a) The Board shall perform the following duties:14        (1) review the Oregon Psilocybin Services Act (Measure 15    109) and any related administrative rules and regulations, 16    the Colorado Natural Medicine Health Act of 2022 17    (Proposition 122) and any related administrative rules and 18    regulations, and other relevant initiatives to legalize or 19    decriminalize psilocybin use in other states or units of 20    local government in an effort to determine any successes 21    or failures that may be applied to the rulemaking process 22    in this State;23        (2) review federal laws, regulations, and policies 24    regarding psilocybin;25        (3) review existing research studies and real-world   SB2772 Engrossed- 10 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1    data related to psilocybin; and2        (4) review sustainability issues related to natural 3    psilocybin and the impact of natural psilocybin on 4    indigenous cultures, including existing reciprocity 5    efforts and continuing support measures.6    (b) Within 18 months after the effective date of this Act, 7the Board shall submit a report to the Governor and the General 8Assembly that includes, but is not limited to:9        (1) an evaluation of federal laws, regulations, and 10    policies regarding psilocybin;11        (2) advice to the Department of Public Health, the 12    Department of Insurance, the Department of Human Services, 13    the Department of Agriculture, the Department of Financial 14    and Professional Regulation, the Illinois State Police, 15    the Department of Revenue, and the General Assembly with 16    respect to public health approaches regarding the use, 17    effect, and risk reduction of psilocybin and the content 18    and scope of educational campaigns related to the 19    legalization of psilocybin for use in medical and 20    psychological treatment;21        (3) recommendations on available medical, 22    psychological, and scientific studies, research, and other 23    information relating to the safety and efficacy of 24    psilocybin in treating various health conditions, 25    including, but not limited to, addiction, depression, 26    anxiety and trauma disorders, headache disorders, and   SB2772 Engrossed- 11 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1    end-of-life psychological distress;2        (4) an evaluation of the medical efficacy of ibogaine 3    (except ibogaine from iboga), mescaline (except mescaline 4    from peyote), botanical forms of dimethyltryptamine, 5    methylenedioxymethamphetamine (MDMA), lysergic acid 6    diethylamide (LSD), and ayahuasca based on medical, 7    psychological, and scientific studies, research, clinical 8    trials in the United States, and other information related 9    to the safety and efficacy of each compound;10        (5) recommendations concerning naturally occurring 11    psilocybin and synthetic psilocybin and the safety and 12    efficacy of these substances;13        (6) whether this State should legalize psilocybin for 14    use in administration sessions;15        (7) if the Board recommends the legalization of 16    psilocybin use in this State, recommendations on the 17    requirements, specifications, and guidelines for providing 18    psilocybin services to a client, including the following:19            (A) the requirements, specifications, and 20        guidelines for holding and verifying the completion of 21        a preparation session, an administration session, and 22        an integration session;23            (B) the contents of the client information and 24        consent forms that a client must complete and sign 25        before the client participates in an administration 26        session, giving particular consideration to the   SB2772 Engrossed- 12 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1        following:2                (i) the information that should be solicited 3            from the client to determine whether the client 4            should participate in the administration session, 5            including information that may identify risk 6            factors and contraindications;7                (ii) the information that should be solicited 8            from the client to assist the service center 9            operator and the facilitator in meeting any public 10            health and safety standards and industry best 11            practices during the administration session; and12                (iii) the health and safety warnings and other 13            disclosures that should be made to the client 14            before the client participates in the 15            administration session;16        (8) recommendations on public health and safety 17    standards and industry best practices for psilocybin 18    product manufacturers, service center operators, 19    facilitators, and laboratories that conduct testing of 20    psilocybin products;21        (9) recommendations on the formulation of a code of 22    professional conduct for facilitators, giving particular 23    consideration to a code of ethics and cultural 24    responsibility and outlining a clear process for reporting 25    complaints of unethical conduct by facilitators or service 26    center employees;  SB2772 Engrossed- 13 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1        (10) recommendations on the education, experience, and 2    training that facilitators must achieve, including whether 3    such education, experience, and training should be 4    available through online resources, giving particular 5    consideration to the following:6            (A) facilitation skills that are affirming, 7        nonjudgmental, nondirective, trauma-informed, and 8        rooted in informed consent;9            (B) support skills for clients during an 10        administration session, including specialized skills 11        for the following:12                (i) client safety;13                (ii) clients who may have a mental health 14            condition; 15                (iii) appropriate boundaries, heightened 16            transference in expanded states of consciousness, 17            and special precautions related to the use of 18            touch in psilocybin sessions; and19                (iv) crisis assessment and appropriate 20            referral for those who need ongoing support if 21            challenging mental health issues emerge in 22            psilocybin sessions;23            (C) the environment in which psilocybin services 24        should occur;25            (D) social and cultural considerations; and26            (E) affordable, equitable, ethical, and culturally   SB2772 Engrossed- 14 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1        responsible access to psilocybin and requirements to 2        ensure that the regulated psilocybin access program is 3        equitable and inclusive;4        (11) recommendations on required examinations for the 5    licensure of facilitators;6        (12) recommendations on public health and safety 7    standards and industry best practices for holding and 8    completing an administration session, including the 9    following: 10            (A) best practices surrounding group 11        administration;12            (B) how clients can safely access common or 13        outside areas on the premises at which the 14        administration session is held;15            (C) the circumstances under which an 16        administration session is considered complete; and17            (D) the transportation needs of the client after 18        the completion of the administration session;19        (13) if the Board recommends psilocybin be legalized 20    for use in administrative sessions, recommendations on a 21    long-term strategic plan for ensuring that psilocybin 22    services become and remain a safe, accessible, and 23    affordable therapeutic option for all persons 21 years of 24    age and older in this State for whom psilocybin may be 25    appropriate;26        (14) actionable recommendations tailored for   SB2772 Engrossed- 15 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1    clinicians, public behavioral health clinics, and any 2    other entities that may issue referrals for psilocybin 3    services;4        (15) recommendations to the General Assembly and 5    relevant State agencies as to whether psilocybin and 6    associated services should be covered under a State health 7    insurance program or another insurance program as a 8    cost-effective intervention for various health conditions, 9    including, but not limited to, anxiety, substance use 10    disorders, alcoholism, depressive disorders, neurological 11    disorders, post-traumatic stress disorder, other painful 12    conditions, including, but not limited to, cluster 13    headaches, migraines, cancer, and phantom limbs, and 14    comfort care, including palliative care, support care, and 15    hospice care;16        (16) recommendations on the availability of Medicaid 17    coverage for psilocybin and associated services;18        (17) existing reciprocity efforts and continuing 19    support measures related to natural psilocybin and the 20    impact of psilocybin on Indigenous cultures; and21        (18) a description of the Board's activities, 22    including, but not limited to, any recommendations and 23    advice to the Department of Public Health, the Department 24    of Agriculture, the Department of Financial and 25    Professional Regulation, the Illinois State Police, the 26    Department of Revenue, or the General Assembly.  SB2772 Engrossed- 16 -LRB104 16758 AAS 30166 b1    (b) The Department of Financial and Professional 2Regulation shall provide technical, logistical, and other 3support to the Board, as requested by the Board, to assist the 4Board with its duties and obligations. 5    Section 90. Repeal. This Act is repealed 2 years after the 6effective date of this Act. 7    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 8becoming law.